Alaska statutes. Title 11. Criminal Law.
Article 6. General Principles of Criminal Liability.

Sec. 11.81.600.
General requirements of culpability.

The minimal requirement for criminal liability is the performance by a person of conduct that includes a voluntary act or the omission to perform an act that the person is capable of performing.

A person is not guilty of an offense unless the person acts with a culpable mental state, except that no culpable mental state must be proved

if the description of the offense does not specify a culpable mental state and the offense is

a violation; or

designated as one of “strict liability”; or

if a legislative intent to dispense with the culpable mental state requirement is present.

History.

(§ 10 ch 166 SLA 1978; am § 27 ch 102 SLA 1980)

Cross references. —

Definition of “conduct,” “voluntary act,” “omission,” “violation,” “culpable mental state” — AS

11.81.900(b)

Intoxication as a defense — AS

11.81.630

Application of AS

11.81.600

—

11.81.630

—

11.81.640

Original Code Provision — None.

TD: II, 19-21.

Legislative history reports. —

For a report on Chapter 102, SLA 1980 (HCS CSSB 511), see 1980 Senate Journal Supplement, No. 44, May 29, 1980, or 1980 House Journal Supplement, No. 79, May 28, 1980.

Sec. 11.81.610.
Construction of statutes with respect to culpability.

[Repealed, § 44 ch 102 SLA 1980.]

Except as provided in AS

11.81.600(b)

, if a provision of law defining an offense does not prescribe a culpable mental state, the culpable mental state that must be proved with respect to

conduct is “knowingly”; and

a circumstance or a result is “recklessly.”

When a provision of law provides that criminal negligence suffices to establish an element of an offense, that element is also established if a person acts intentionally, knowingly, or recklessly. If acting recklessly suffices to establish an element, that element also is established if a person acts intentionally or knowingly. If acting knowingly suffices to establish an element, that element is also established if a person acts intentionally.

History.

(§ 10 ch 166 SLA 1978; am § 44 ch 102 SLA 1980)

Cross references. —

Definition of “culpable mental state,” “law,” “conduct” — AS

11.81.900(b)

Definition of “intentionally,” “knowingly,” “recklessly,” “criminal negligence” — AS

11.81.900(a)

General requirements of culpability — AS

11.81.600

Application of AS

11.81.600

—

11.81.630

— AS

11.81.640

Original Code Provision — None.

TD: II, 21-22.

Sec. 11.81.615.
Offenses defined by age or value.

Whenever a provision of law defining an offense requires a determination of the age of the victim or the value of property or services, it is not a defense to the lowest class of offense established by the evidence that the age of the victim is less than the age which would make the offense a higher class of offense or that the value of the property or services exceeds the value which would make the offense a higher class of offense, and a person may be charged and convicted accordingly.

History.

(§ 10 ch 166 SLA 1978)

Cross references. —

Definition of “property,” “services” — AS

11.81.900(b)

Determination of value; aggregation of amounts — AS

11.46.980

Original Code Provision — None.

Sec. 11.81.620.
Effect of ignorance or mistake upon liability.

Knowledge, recklessness, or criminal negligence as to whether conduct constitutes an offense, or knowledge, recklessness, or criminal negligence as to the existence, meaning, or application of the provision of law defining an offense, is not an element of an offense unless the provision of law clearly so provides. Use of the phrase “intent to commit a crime”, “intent to promote or facilitate the commission of a crime”, or like terminology in a provision of law does not require that the defendant act with a culpable mental state as to the criminality of the conduct that is the object of the defendant’s intent.

A person is not relieved of criminal liability for conduct because the person engages in the conduct under a mistaken belief of fact, unless

the factual mistake is a reasonable one that negates the culpable mental state required for the commission of the offense;

the provision of law defining the offense or a related provision of law expressly provides that the factual mistake constitutes a defense or exemption; or

the factual mistake is a reasonable one that supports a defense of justification as provided in AS

11.81.320

—

11.81.430

.

History.

(§ 10 ch 166 SLA 1978; am § 28 ch 102 SLA 1980)

Cross references. —

Definition of “intentionally,” “knowingly,” “recklessly,” “criminal negligence” — AS

11.81.900(a)

Original Code Provision — None.

TD: II, 22-23.

Sec. 11.81.630.
Intoxication as a defense.

Voluntary intoxication is not a defense to a prosecution for an offense, but evidence that the defendant was intoxicated may be offered whenever it is relevant to negate an element of the offense that requires that the defendant intentionally cause a result.

History.

(§ 10 ch 166 SLA 1978)

Cross references. —

Definition of “intoxicated” — AS

11.81.900(b)

Definition of “intentionally” — AS

11.81.900(a)

Intoxication as sentencing factor — AS

12.55.155(g)

Application of AS

11.81.600

-

11.81.630

— AS

11.81.640

Original Code Provision — AS 11.70.030.

TD: II, 23-24.

Sec. 11.81.640.
Application of AS 11.81.600 — 11.81.630.

AS

11.81.600

—

11.81.630

apply only to this title.

History.

(§ 10 ch 166 SLA 1978)

Cross references. —

Original Code Provision — None.